Utah statutes.
20A-7-311.   Effective date.

(1) (a)  Any proposed law submitted to the people by referendum petition that is approved by the voters at any election does not take effect until at least five days after the date of the official proclamation of the vote by the governor.

(b)  Any act or law submitted to the people by referendum that is approved by the voters at any election takes effect on the date specified in the referendum petition.

(c)  If the referendum petition does not specify an effective date, a law approved by the voters at any election takes effect five days after the date of the official proclamation of the vote by the governor.

(2) (a)  The governor may not veto a law adopted by the people.

(b)  The Legislature may amend any laws approved by the people at any legislative session after the law has taken effect.



Enacted by Chapter 1, 1994 General Session

